Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.020

Findings. (Expires June 30, 2025.)

The state legislature finds that state entities may fail to deliver services as effectively and efficiently as is expected by the general public and as originally contemplated by the legislature. It further finds that state government actions have produced a substantial increase in numbers of entities, growth of programs, and proliferation of rules, and that the entire process has evolved without sufficient legislative and executive oversight, regulatory accountability, or a system of checks and balances. The legislature further finds that by establishing a system for the termination, continuation, or modification of state entities, coupled with a system of scheduled review of such entities, it will be in a better position to: Evaluate the need for the continued existence of existing and future state entities; assess the effectiveness and performance of agencies, boards, commissions, and programs; and ensure public accountability. The legislature recognizes that the executive branch shares in this duty and responsibility to assure that state government operates in an efficient, orderly, and responsive manner.

[ 2000 c 189 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 289 s 2.]